North Carolina statutes. Chapter 67. Dogs.
Article 2. License Taxes on Dogs.

§§ 67-5 through 67-11.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 822, s. 6.

Cross References.

As to the effect of the repeal, see the Editor’s note following

G.S. 153A-1

.

§ 67-12.
Permitting dogs to run at large at night; penalty; liability for damage.

No person shall allow his dog over six months old to run at large in the nighttime unaccompanied by the owner or by some member of the owner’s family, or some other person by the owner’s permission. Any person intentionally, knowingly, and willfully violating this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and shall also be liable in damages to any person injured or suffering loss to his property or chattels.

History.

1919, c. 116, s. 5; C.S., s. 1680; 1993, c. 539, s. 534; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Local Modification.

Buncombe: 1925, c. 314; Forsyth: 1967, c. 918; Gaston: 1973, c. 1327; Halifax, New Hanover, Wake: 1925, c. 314; Watauga: Pub. Loc. 1927, c. 503 (See

G.S. 67-18

); Yancey: 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 897.

§ 67-13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 822, s. 6.

§ 67-14.
Mad dogs, dogs killing sheep, etc., may be killed.

Any person may kill any mad dog, and also any dog if he is killing sheep, cattle, hogs, goats, or poultry.

History.

1919, c. 116, s. 8; C.S., s. 1682.

Cross References.

As to liability of owner who fails to kill sheep-killing dog, see

G.S. 67-3

.

As to liability of owner who fails to kill mad dog, see

G.S. 67-4

.

§ 67-14.1.
Dogs injuring deer or bear on wildlife management area may be killed; impounding unmuzzled dogs running at large.

Any dog which trails, runs, injures or kills any deer or bear on any wildlife refuge, sanctuary or management area, now or hereafter so designated and managed by the Wildlife Resources Commission, during the closed season for hunting with dogs on such refuge or management area, is hereby declared to be a public nuisance, and any wildlife protector or other duly authorized agent or employee of the Wildlife Resources Commission may destroy, by humane method, any dog discovered trailing, running, injuring or killing any deer or bear in any such area during the closed season therein for hunting such game with dogs, without incurring liability by reason of his act in conformity with this section.

Any unmuzzled dog running at large upon any wildlife refuge, sanctuary, or management area, when unaccompanied by any person having such dog in charge, shall be seized and impounded by any wildlife protector, or other duly authorized agent or employee of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

The person impounding such dog shall cause a notice to be published at least once a week for two successive weeks in some newspaper published in the county wherein the dog was taken, or if none is published therein, in some newspaper having general circulation in the county. Such notice shall set forth a description of the dog, the place where it is impounded, and that the dog will be destroyed if not claimed and payment made for the advertisement, a catch fee of one dollar ($1.00) and the boarding, computed at the rate of fifty cents (50¢) per day, while impounded, by a certain date which date shall be not less than 15 days after the publication of the first notice. A similar notice shall be posted at the courthouse door.

The owner of the dog, or his agent, may recover such dog upon payment of the cost of the publication of the notices hereinbefore described together with a catch fee of one dollar ($1.00) and the expense, computed at the rate of fifty cents (50¢) per day, incurred while impounding and boarding the dog.

If any impounded dog is not recovered by the owner within 15 days after the publication of the first notice of the impounding, the dog may be destroyed in a humane manner by any wildlife protector or other duly authorized agent or employee of the North Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission, and no liability shall attach to any person acting in accordance with this section.

History.

1951, c. 1021, s. 1.

§ 67-15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 35, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to larceny of animals generally, see now

G.S. 14-84

.

§ 67-16.
Failure to discharge duties imposed under this Article.

Any person failing to discharge any duty imposed upon him under this Article shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1919, c. 116, s. 10; C.S., s. 1684; 1993, c. 539, s. 535; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 67-17.
[Repealed]

Deleted.

§ 67-18.
Application of Article.

This Article,

G.S. 67-5

to 67-18, inclusive, is hereby made applicable to every county in the State of North Carolina, notwithstanding any provisions in local, special or private acts exempting any county or any township or municipality from the provisions of the same enacted at any General Assembly commencing at the General Assembly of 1919 and going through the General Assembly of 1929.

History.

1929, c. 318.